Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-726
Costs and fees.

(a) The petitioner shall not be required to pay a filing fee or other costs.

(b) If an obligee prevails, a responding tribunal of this state may assess against an obligor filing fees, reasonable attorney's fees, other costs, and necessary travel and other reasonable expenses incurred by the obligee and the obligee's witnesses. The tribunal shall not assess fees, costs, or expenses against the obligee or the support enforcement agency of either the initiating or the responding state or foreign country, except as provided by other law. Attorney's fees may be taxed as costs, and may be ordered paid directly to the attorney, who may enforce the order in the attorney's own name. Payment of support owed to the obligee has priority over fees, costs, and expenses.

(c) The tribunal shall order the payment of costs and reasonable attorney's fees if it determines that a hearing was requested primarily for delay. In a proceeding under sections 42-736 to 42-747.04, a hearing is presumed to have been requested primarily for delay if a registered support order is confirmed or enforced without change.

Laws 1993, LB 500, § 26;

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 65;

Laws 2015, LB415, § 23.